Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2612
Consent to service by acceptance of appointment; notice.

By accepting a testamentary or court appointment as guardian, a guardian submits personally to the jurisdiction of the court in any proceeding relating to the guardianship that may be instituted by any interested person. Notice of any proceeding shall be delivered to the guardian, or mailed to him by ordinary mail at his address as listed in the court records and to his address as then known to the petitioner. Letters of guardianship must indicate whether the guardian was appointed by will or by court order.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 230, UPC § 5-208.